Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska76-1463
Mobile home, defined.

Mobile home shall mean a movable or portable dwelling constructed to be towed on its own chassis, connected to utilities, and designed with or without a permanent foundation for year-round living. It may consist of one or more units that can be telescoped when towed and expanded later for additional capacity, or of two or more units, separately towable but designed to be joined into one integral unit, and shall include a manufactured home as defined in section 71-4603.

Laws 1984, LB 916, § 14;

Laws 1985, LB 313, § 25.